California statutes. Education Code
 of the credential sought, who complies with all of the following:

(1) The individual submits evidence of two years of rigorous performance evaluations while teaching in an accredited private school, based on criteria determined by the commission, on which the applicant received ratings of satisfactory or better.

(2) The individual meets the California requirements for teacher fitness pursuant to Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 19.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44259.3.

The commission shall review the minimum requirements set forth in Section 44259 for the preliminary and professional multiple subject teaching credential and shall recommend their revision as necessary, during the normal revision cycles, to ensure that teachers of the elementary grades receive training related to, and have knowledge of, developmentally appropriate teaching methods for pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, who may be of the same grade level but of vastly different developmental levels. As part of its review, the commission shall ensure that the requirements link academic theory regarding child development to instructional methods designed for use in classrooms of young pupils of varying developmental levels. These instructional methods should be designed to ensure success and progress by all pupils and should especially help teachers ensure that children who enter school less prepared or with fewer skills than their classmates meet the expected performance standards for that grade by the end of the instructional year. At the conclusion of its review, the commission shall report to the Legislature on its recommended revisions, on or before January 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

44259.4.

(a) (1) There is hereby established the Pathways to Bilingual Teaching Program, to be administered by the commission, for the purpose of increasing the number of California teachers qualified to teach in bilingual settings.

(2) The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the commission for allocation pursuant to this section for grant awards to be used through the 2031–32 fiscal year.

(3) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school, or a regional occupational
 center or program operated by a joint powers authority or county office of education.

(b) (1) Commencing January 1, 2027, the commission shall develop and implement a program to award, on a competitive basis, grants of up to six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000), which may be expended over six years, to local educational agencies, applying individually or as a consortium, to form, pursuant to subdivision (c),
 consortia with four-year institutions of higher education or consortia with four-year institutions of higher education and community colleges, for the purpose of establishing or expanding existing pathways to bilingual teaching to enable bilingual candidates to earn a multiple subject, single subject, PK-3 early childhood education specialist, or education specialist credential, with a bilingual authorization.

(2) The commission shall give priority for grants to consortia of local educational agencies whose applications demonstrate a high need for teachers with a bilingual authorization by meeting one or both of the following:

(A) The consortium includes one or more local educational agencies with a high concentration of pupils who are English language learners.

(B) The consortium includes one or more local educational agencies located in a rural area or a geographic region experiencing an acute systemic shortage of teachers with a bilingual authorization, characterized by a significant gap between available
 commission-approved bilingual teacher preparation programs and the needs of local pupils who are English language learners.

(3) For purposes of this section, “pathway to bilingual teaching” means an articulated, guided sequence of secondary education, postsecondary education, and teacher preparation, including preparation to earn a bilingual authorization, leading to employment as a bilingual teacher.

(c) (1) Grant recipients shall develop and implement a broader consortium through a partnership with one or more four-year institutions of
 higher education, or one or more four-year institutions of higher education and one or more community colleges.

(2) Broader consortia formed pursuant to this subdivision shall do all of the following:

(A) Recruit bilingual candidates
 from local educational agencies for the pathway to bilingual teaching based on candidates’ interest in teaching, including, but not limited to, current paraprofessionals and classified employees.

(B) To the extent feasible, develop pathways to bilingual teaching for high school pupils with experience working in after school programs, participating in a career technical education pathway in education, or participating in future teacher clubs, and for candidates who are
 making progress towards meeting
 the eligibility criteria to receive the State Seal of Biliteracy.

(C) Establish a component of the pathway with at least one of the following:

(i) A community college or four-year institution of higher education to use dual
 enrollment, including early and middle college programs, to enable these candidates to earn part or all of their associate’s degrees before graduation.

(ii) A four-year institution of higher education into which these candidates transfer and in which they earn their baccalaureate degrees and a multiple subject, single subject, PK-3 early childhood education specialist, or education specialist teaching credential, with a bilingual authorization.

 (3) Broader consortia may enter into an agreement with one or more local educational agencies, including, but not limited to, local educational agencies enrolling candidates in the pathway, to hire qualified graduates of the pathway in bilingual teaching positions.

(d) Grants pursuant to subdivision (b) shall fund proposals to establish new or expand existing pathways to bilingual teaching, with the first year of the grant for planning purposes and the subsequent five years of the grant for implementation purposes. These funds may be expended for any proper purpose in support of this section, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) To provide
 broader consortia teachers, administrators, and faculty release time or stipends to design the pathway and obtain any necessary agreements to implement the pathway.

(2) To create or redesign courses for candidates in a pathway to bilingual teaching.

(3) To design appropriate recruitment, guidance, and support strategies for candidates participating in the pathway.

(e) As a condition of a grant, a broader consortium described in subdivision (c) shall provide to the commission program and outcome information
 annually for at least
 six years after receiving the grant. The information shall include program design and features, the number of candidates enrolled in the program, the number of candidates who have completed the program, the number and type of credentials and bilingual authorizations earned, the time taken to earn a degree and credential, commitments made by local educational agencies with the intent to offer employment of bilingual teaching positions, any other information the commission may require for purposes of documenting the effect of the grant and identifying effective practices in program design and implementation, and, if applicable, home languages spoken by graduates, racial and ethnic backgrounds of graduates, and graduates who are or have ever been English language learners.

(f) The commission shall require applicants for grants under this section to provide assurances of all of the following:

(1) A commitment to implement a planned pathway to bilingual teaching.

(2) A plan for recruitment and retention of candidates for the pathway to bilingual teaching for open positions.

(3) Coordination with existing sources of candidate support, such as the Educator Recruitment and Retention Initiative established pursuant to Article 13.5 (commencing with Section 44400) and the Golden State Teacher Grant Program established pursuant to Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 69617) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3, and other forms of financial aid.

(4) Demonstrated commitment to develop or expand enrollment in, and access to, the pathway to bilingual teaching.

(5) A plan to sustain the pathway to bilingual teaching after funding provided under this section expires.

(g) The commission shall, until December 31, 2032,
 annually report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature on the progress grant recipients have made in developing and implementing pathways to bilingual teaching, including, when appropriate, the number of teachers who are enrolled in the pathways and the number of teachers who have completed the pathways and are employed in bilingual settings as reported by local educational agencies.

(h) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section
 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 16.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44259.5.

(a) By July 1, 2002, the commission shall ensure that an accredited program of professional preparation offered pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259 satisfies standards established by the commission for the preparation of teachers for all pupils, including English language learners. The standards shall be based upon an independent job analysis of the essential knowledge, skills, and abilities needed by all classroom teachers to develop English language skills while maintaining academic progress across the curriculum and shall take into account existing standards and test specifications for the Crosscultural, Language and Academic Development certificate. The commission shall ensure that the standards established pursuant to this subdivision are aligned with the requirements of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259 and Section 60200.4.

(b) To maintain current statutory options for teachers in completing credential requirements, the commission shall provide candidates, including candidates prepared in other states, with an examination route to fulfilling the requirements pursuant to subdivision (a) for essential preparation to teach English language learners. The commission shall provide for a comprehensive validity study of the examination before implementing this section.

(c) Commencing July 1, 2003, the commission may not issue a preliminary teaching credential to an applicant pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44259 unless the applicant has satisfied the standards and requirements established pursuant to subdivision (a) or has an authorization to provide services to English language learners issued pursuant to Section 44253, 44253.1, 44253.2, 44253.3, 44253.4, or 44253.10.

(d) Commencing July 1, 2003, an approved program of beginning teacher induction offered pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 44259 shall satisfy standards established by the commission and the Superintendent of Public Instruction for beginning teacher induction for teachers for all pupils, including English language learners. The commission and the superintendent shall incorporate in these standards the essential knowledge, skills, and abilities needed for first-year and second-year certificated teachers to apply effective instructional strategies that assist pupils to develop English language proficiency while maintaining academic progress across the curriculum. The standards shall be based upon the independent job analysis of the essential knowledge, skills, and abilities for all classroom teachers conducted pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) Commencing July 1, 2005, the commission may not initially issue a professional clear teaching credential to an applicant pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 44259 unless the applicant has satisfied the standards and requirements established pursuant to subdivision (d) or has an authorization to provide services to English language learners issued pursuant to Section 44253, 44253.1, 44253.2, 44253.3, 44253.4, or 44253.10.

(f) No provision of this section applies to the University of California except to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution, make that provision applicable.

(g) A candidate for a teaching credential pursuant to Section 44259 is entitled to earn and receive the credential by fulfilling the standards and requirements for the credential that were in effect when the candidate entered accredited preparation or approved induction for the credential.

(h) By July 1, 2001, the commission shall report to the education policy committees in each house of the Legislature on the new standards it is required to develop pursuant to subdivision (a) and the progress of the implementation of the new standards by accredited programs of professional preparation.

(i) By July 1, 2002, the commission shall report to the education policy committees in each house of the Legislature on the outcomes and recommendations for the implementation of the validity study required pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 18.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

44259.6.

By September 1, 2022, the commission shall ensure that its standards of program quality and effectiveness for the preparation of candidates for the preliminary multiple subject credential, the preliminary single subject English language arts credential, and the preliminary education specialist credential, and the teaching performance expectations for the preliminary multiple subject credential, the preliminary single subject English language arts credential, and the preliminary education specialist credential, include and specify all of the requirements in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 678, Sec. 4.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44259.7.

By September 1, 2024, the commission shall ensure that, in addition to the requirements of Section 44259.6, its standards of program quality and effectiveness for the preparation of candidates for the preliminary multiple subject credential, the preliminary single subject English language arts credential, and the preliminary education specialist credential, and the teaching performance expectations for the preliminary multiple subject credential, the preliminary single subject English language arts credential, and the preliminary education specialist credential, include all of the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259, including those added by the act that added this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 678, Sec. 5.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44259.8.

(a) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the commission shall use the funding appropriated in Item 6100–488 of the Budget Act of 2026 to enter into an agreement with a county office of education, consistent with applicable state procurement and information technology requirements, to collaborate on the design, development, and implementation of a statewide subject matter transcript review service. The selected entity shall deliver the system to the commission by July 1, 2027. The commission shall maintain and operate the service.

(b) The commission shall consult with institutions of higher education, including institutions that operate commission-approved teacher preparation programs, local educational agencies, and relevant experts in developing,
 calibrating, and evaluating the service.

(c) The service shall allow commission-approved teacher preparation programs and local educational agencies to submit candidate or employee transcripts and supporting materials to the commission for transcript review, as follows:

(1) The commission may identify the supporting materials necessary to complete a transcript review, including course catalog descriptions, syllabi, or other documentation needed to evaluate alignment with commission-adopted subject matter requirements.

(2) The commission shall establish a methodology for technology-supported analysis and human review to support consistent application of subject matter requirements.

(3) (A) A commission-approved educator preparation
 program may, before the adoption of the advisory analysis process described in subdivision (e), request an advisory analysis of transcripts and supporting materials.

(B) The commission shall, through the service, produce an advisory analysis in response to the request described in subparagraph (A) of the extent to which the submitted transcripts and supporting materials align with subject matter competency requirements.

(C) A commission-approved educator preparation program may review, affirm, modify, or rely on the advisory analysis for purposes of making its own determination of subject matter competency consistent with clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(4) (A) A local educational agency may, upon the adoption of the advisory analysis
 process described in subdivision (e), request an advisory analysis of transcripts and supporting materials.

(B) The commission shall, through the service, produce an advisory analysis in response to the request described in subparagraph (A) of the extent to which the submitted transcripts and supporting materials align with subject matter competency requirements.

(d) The service shall comply with applicable state and federal privacy laws, security requirements, accessibility standards, and applicable artificial intelligence governance standards.

(e) (1) The commission shall, at a public meeting and following an opportunity for public comment, take action to adopt formal processes for producing advisory analyses through the service and making subject matter competency determinations through the
 service, subject to demonstrated accuracy, consistency, and reliability.

(2) The commission may adopt regulations as necessary to implement and administer this section.

(f) (1) On or before January 1, 2029, the commission shall report to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on implementation of the service, including usage and any recommendations for future policy or statutory changes.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed pursuant to paragraph (1) is inoperative on January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 62.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44260.

The minimum requirements for the three-year preliminary designated subjects career technical education teaching credential shall be all of the following:

(a) Three years or the equivalent of adequate, successful, and recent experience in, or experience and education in, the subject named on the credential.

(b) Possession of a high school diploma or the passage of an equivalency examination as designated by the commission.

(c) Satisfaction of the requirements for teacher fitness pursuant to Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341.

(d) Commencing July 1, 2025, certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) that meets the standards established by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the holder of a credential described in this section shall satisfy the minimum experience requirements established by the local educational agency for each course the credentialholder is assigned to
 teach.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 65, Sec. 1.   (AB 2345)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44260.1.

The minimum requirements for the five-year clear designated subjects career technical education teaching credential shall be all of the following:

(a) A valid three-year preliminary designated subjects career technical education teaching credential.

(b) Two years of successful teaching, or the equivalent, as authorized by the preliminary designated subjects career technical education teaching credential.

(c) Completion of a program of personalized preparation as approved by the commission. It is the intent of the Legislature that the program of personalized preparation be consistent with whether the credentialholder performs full- or part-time service.

(d) The study of health education, as specified in clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(e) Completion of two semester units or passage of an examination on the principles and provisions of the United States Constitution, as specified in Section 44335.

(f) The study of computer-based technology, including the uses of technology in educational settings.

(g) Commencing July 1, 2025, certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) that meets the standards established by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross unless the applicant has already demonstrated their certification in CPR pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 44260.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the holder of a credential described in this section shall satisfy the minimum experience requirements established by the local educational agency for each course the credentialholder is assigned to teach.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 49.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44260.2.

The minimum requirements for the three-year preliminary designated subjects adult education teaching credential shall be all of the following:

(a) For nonacademic subjects:

(1) Three years of adequate, successful, and recent experience in, or a combination of experience and education in, the nonacademic subject to be named on the credential.

(2) Possession of a high school diploma or the passage of an equivalency examination as designated by the commission.

(b) For academic subjects, a baccalaureate or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education that includes a
 minimum of 20 semester units, or the equivalent quarter units, of coursework in the subject to be named on the credential.

(c) Satisfaction of the requirements for teacher fitness pursuant to Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 32.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

44260.3.

The minimum requirements for the five-year clear designated subjects adult education teaching credential shall be all of the following:

(a) A valid three-year preliminary designated subjects adult education teaching credential.

(b) Two years of successful teaching, or the equivalent, as authorized by the preliminary designated subjects adult education teaching credential.

(c) A program of personalized preparation as approved by the commission.

(d) The study of health education as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(e) Completion of two semester units or passage of an examination on the principles and provisions of the United States Constitution, as specified in Section 44335.

(f) The study of computer-based technology, including the uses of technology in educational settings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 427, Sec. 7.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

44260.4.

The minimum requirements for the designated subjects special subjects teaching credential shall be appropriate to the special subject named on the credential, in accordance with the requirements established by the commission. Special subjects instruction may include, but shall not be limited to, driver education and training.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1361, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

44260.5.

The commission shall establish minimum requirements for the issuance and renewal of the designated subjects teaching credentials for part-time service. Designated subjects teaching credentials issued for part-time service shall not authorize service for more than one-half of a full-time teaching assignment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1361, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

44260.6.

The minimum requirements for the designated subjects supervision and coordination credential shall include all of the following:

(a) Possession of a designated subjects teaching credential, other than for part-time service.

(b) Three years of full-time teaching experience in the subject named on the designated subjects teaching credential.

(c) Completion of a commission-approved personalized preservice program in supervision and coordination.

(d) The designated subjects supervision and coordination credential shall authorize the holder to supervise and coordinate designated subjects classes and programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1361, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

44260.7.

The commission may develop alternative routes to the subject matter coursework requirements for the preliminary designated subjects credential in driver education and training, including approved staff development programs offered by school districts and county offices of education, if the alternative routes meet standards established by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 447, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

44260.9.

(a) The commission shall establish a list of authorized subjects for the designated subjects preliminary career technical education teaching credential issued pursuant to Section 44260. The list shall reflect the 15 industry sectors identified in the California career technical education model curriculum standards adopted by the state board. The commission also shall ensure that each designated subjects professional clear credential issued is consistent with the list of authorized subjects used for the preliminary credential. The commission shall implement the authorized subjects list by September 30, 2007.

(b) (1) The commission shall convene an advisory committee to review credential requirements for designated subjects career technical education teaching credentials and make recommendations for consolidating requirements for full-time and part-time service. It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission focus on streamlining the credential structure by identifying the essential skills needed for successful career technical instruction.

(2) By April 1, 2008, the commission shall make recommendations to the Legislature on the minimum requirements for designated subjects career technical education teaching credentials.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 520, Sec. 3.   Effective October 12, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

44261.

The minimum requirements for the multiple or single subject teaching credential with a designated emphasis shall be as specified in Section 44259.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1245, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44261.2.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) The role of parents and guardians in the education of pupils and the development of children and youth is critically important.

(2) Active partnerships among parents, guardians, and professional educators are essential features of effective education.

(3) (A) Recent and anticipated changes in the conditions of childhood and adolescence, including, but not limited to, the changing family structure and ethnic and cultural diversity, make it more critical than before that partnerships among parents, guardians, and
 professional educators be effective.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that prospective teachers and certificated educators acquire needed perspectives to serve as active partners with parents and guardians in the education of pupils.

(b) The commission shall adopt standards and requirements pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259, Section 44265, Sections 44266 to 44270.1, inclusive, and Section 44372 that emphasize the preparation of prospective teachers and other certificated educators to serve as active partners with parents and guardians in the education of pupils. The standards shall address, through appropriate instruction and field experiences, the roles of parents and guardians in the educational process, strategies for involving and working with parents and guardians, and the changing conditions of childhood and adolescence, including,
 but not limited to, the changing family structure and ethnic and cultural diversity.

(c) An institution meets the standards set forth in subdivision (b) with the incorporation of appropriate content within existing professional preparation courses.

(d) The implementation of subdivision (b) as it applies to paragraphs (3) and (4) of Section 44259 shall occur in conjunction with the review of requirements for earning and renewing multiple and single subject teaching credentials, as required by subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 44259.2.

(e) The standards and requirements developed pursuant to subdivision (b) and the conditions described in subdivision (d) of this section shall not apply to any person holding a valid credential on December 31, 1993.

(f) The commission shall not, by regulation, revoke or restrict in any way a credential that was valid before the effective date of this section unless the commission issues the holder of the credential a valid substitute credential. The authorization of the substitute credential shall not be more restrictive than that of the former credential. The definition of the term “authorization,” in subdivision (a) of Section 44203, applies to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 15.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44262.

Upon the recommendation of the governing board of a school district, the commission may issue an eminence credential to any person who has achieved eminence in a field of endeavor taught or service practiced in the public schools of California. This credential shall authorize teaching or the performance of services in the public schools in the subject or subject area or service and at the level or levels approved by the commission as designated on the credential.

Each credential so issued shall be issued initially for a two-year period and may be renewed for a three-year period by the commission upon the request of the governing board of the school district. Upon completion of the three-year renewal period, the holder of an eminence credential shall be eligible upon application for a professional clear teaching credential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1067, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

44262.5.

(a) Upon recommendation of the tribal government of a federally recognized Indian tribe in California, the commission shall issue an American Indian language-culture credential to a candidate who has met the following requirements:

(1) (A) For the American Indian language authorization, demonstrated fluency in that tribe’s language based on an assessment developed and administered by that federally recognized Indian tribe pursuant to subdivision (e).

(B) For the American Indian culture authorization, demonstrated knowledge in that tribe’s culture based on an assessment developed and administered by that federally recognized Indian tribe pursuant to subdivision (e).

(C) Candidates meeting the requirements of both subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall be granted both the American Indian language and the American Indian culture authorizations.

(2) Successfully completed a criminal background check conducted under Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341 for credentialing purposes.

(3) Submitted an application, fee, and recommendation for the credential to the commission through the federally recognized Indian
 tribe.

(b) The American Indian language-culture credential shall authorize the holder to teach the American Indian language, or culture, or both, for which the credential was issued in California public schools in preschool, kindergarten, grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and in adult education courses.

(c) The holder of an American Indian language-culture credential who does not also have a valid teaching credential issued by the State of California shall not teach in a public school, including a charter school, any subject other than the American Indian language, or culture, or both, for which he or she is credentialed.

(d) Each American Indian language-culture credential shall be issued initially for a two-year period and may be renewed for a three-year period upon recommendation of the tribal government. Upon completion of the three-year period, the holder of an
 American Indian language-culture credential shall be eligible for a clear teaching credential for that language upon application and the recommendation of the tribal government, in consultation with the applicant’s public school employer.

(e) (1) Each federally recognized American Indian tribe is encouraged to develop a written and oral assessment that should be successfully completed before an applicant is recommended for an American Indian language-culture
 credential.

(2) In developing the language assessment, an Indian tribe should determine all of the following:

(A) Which dialects of the tribal language will be included in the assessment.

(B) Whether the Indian tribe will standardize its writing system.

(C) The standard of knowledge and fluency required to qualify for an American Indian language
 authorization in that tribal language.

(D) Standards for effective teaching methods to be evaluated in the classroom.

(3) In developing the culture assessment, an Indian tribe should determine all of the following:

(A) The candidate’s understanding of the tribe’s culture and its practices, including, but not limited to, ceremonies and traditions, social institutions and relationships, holidays and festivals, health practices and traditions, patterns of work and leisure, and culinary traditions and practices.

(B) The standard of knowledge required to qualify for an American Indian culture authorization in that tribal culture.

(C) Standards for effective teaching methods to be evaluated in the classroom.

(4) The assessment should be administered at an appropriate location that does not create hardship for members of the Indian tribe administering the assessment.

(f) Upon agreement by the tribe, a tribe recommending a candidate for an American Indian language-culture 
 credential shall develop and administer a technical assistance program guided by the California Standards for the Teaching Profession. To the extent feasible, the program shall be offered by teachers credentialed in an American Indian language, or culture, or both, who have three or more years of teaching experience. The technical assistance program may consist of direct classroom observation and consultation, assistance in instructional planning and preparation, support in implementation and delivery of classroom instruction, and other assistance intended to enhance the professional performance and development of the teacher of an American Indian language, or culture, or both.

(g) Public school personnel responsible for evaluating teachers, in accordance with local governing board policy, shall provide individuals
 employed to teach on the basis of the American Indian language-culture credential with information on the teaching personnel evaluation process and the California Standards for the Teaching Profession.

(h) For a candidate who has already received an American Indian languages credential before the effective date of this section, the tribe that recommended the candidate for the American Indian
 languages credential shall determine if the candidate may add the American Indian culture authorization to the preexisting languages credential, or if the candidate must reapply for the American Indian culture authorization as a new initial credential pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 64, Sec. 1.   (AB 163)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

44263.

A teacher licensed pursuant to the provisions of this article may be assigned, with his or her consent, to teach a single subject class in which he or she has 18 semester hours of coursework or nine semester hours of upper division or graduate coursework or a multiple subject class if he or she holds at least 60 semester hours equally distributed among the 10 areas of a diversified major set forth in Section 44314. A three-semester-unit variance in any of the required 10 areas may be allowed. The governing board of the school district by resolution shall provide specific authorization for the assignment. The authorization of the governing board shall remain valid for one year and may be renewed annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 53, Sec. 5.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44264.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person holding a credential issued under the laws and regulations in effect on or before December 31, 1971, authorizing teaching in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, or grades 7 to 9, inclusive, in the secondary schools may be assigned, with his or her consent, to teach any subject authorized on his or her credential in grades 5 and 6 or grade 5 or grade 6 in a departmentalized program in a school composed of grades 5, 6, 7, and 8 or grades 6, 7, and 8.

 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person holding a credential issued under the laws and regulations in effect on or before December 31, 1971, authorizing administration in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, in the secondary schools may be assigned, with his or her consent, to provide administration for grades 5 and 6 or grade 6, in a school composed of grades 5, 6, 7, and 8 or grades 6, 7, and 8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 171, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

44265.

(a) Credentials for teaching specialties, including, but not limited to, bilingual education, early childhood education, and special education, shall be based upon a baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education, completion of a program of professional preparation, and any other standards which the commission may establish.
